Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.035

Legislative declaration—Focus of the beef commission—Regulating beef and beef products—Existing comprehensive scheme—Laws applicable.

The legislature declares:

(1) That the history, economy, culture, and the future of Washington state's agriculture involves the beef industry. It is vital to the economy and to citizens' health that the beef industry continue to progress and thrive. The Washington state beef commission is part of an existing comprehensive system to regulate and promote beef and beef products;

(2) That the focus of the beef commission shall include the following responsibilities:

(a) The beef industry is to be promoted in a manner that showcases the varied aspects and segments of the industry;

(b) Research, education, and programs related to health and safety of beef are to be advanced in cooperation with the Washington state department of agriculture, Washington State University, other institutions of higher learning as appropriate, and other governmental or nongovernmental organizations doing research on trade or health issues;

(c) Support is to be provided to the beef industry in establishing orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and unhampered marketing, grading, and standardizing of beef and beef products; and

(d) Maintain efforts to increase consumption of beef and beef products within the state, the nation, and internationally;

(3) That beef producers operate within a regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them for the benefit of society and the citizens of the state and includes restrictions on marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the beef producer's ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(4) That it is in the overriding public interest that support for the beef industry be clearly expressed, that adequate protection be given to agricultural commodities, uses, activities, and operations, and that beef and beef products be promoted individually, and as part of a comprehensive industry to:

(a) Enhance the reputation and image of Washington state's agriculture industry;

(b) Increase the sale and use of beef products in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(c) Protect the public by educating the public in reference to sustainable stewardship of cattle and the environment, quality, care, and methods used in the production of beef and beef products, and in reference to the various cuts and grades of beef and the uses to which each should be put;

(d) Increase the knowledge of the health-giving qualities and dietetic value of beef products; and

(e) Support and engage in programs or activities that benefit the care and well-being of the cattle, and the production, handling, processing, marketing, and uses of beef and beef products;

(5) That this chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state; and

(6) That the beef industry is a highly regulated industry and that this chapter and the rules adopted under it are only one aspect of the regulated industry. Other regulations and restraints applicable to the beef industry include the:

(a) Beef promotion and research act of 1985, U.S.C. Title 7, chapter 62;

(b) Beef promotion and research, 7 C.F.R., Part 1260;

(c) Agricultural marketing act, 7 U.S.C., section 1621;

(d) USDA meat grading, certification, and standards, 7 C.F.R., Part 54;

(e) Mandatory price reporting, 7 C.F.R., Part 57;

(f) Grazing permits, 43 C.F.R., Part 2920;

(g) Capper-Volstead act, U.S.C. Title 7, chapters [sections] 291 and 292;

(h) Livestock identification under chapter 16.57 RCW and rules;

(i) Organic products act under chapter 15.86 RCW and rules;

(j) The food safety and security act under chapter 15.130 RCW;

(k) Washington food processing act under chapter 69.07 RCW and rules;

(l) Washington food storage warehouses act under chapter 69.10 RCW and rules;

(m) Animal health under chapter 16.36 RCW and rules; and

(n) Weights and measures under chapter 19.94 RCW and rules.

[ 2018 c 236 s 711; 2017 c 256 s 1; 2011 c 103 s 34; 2002 c 313 s 79.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.